Indiana, session 2026, HB1111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) As used in this section, "utility" means a
person, however organized, that provides retail electric, natural
gas, water, or wastewater service in Indiana to the public for
compensation, including the following:
(1) A public utility (as defined in section 1(a) of this chapter).
(2) A municipally owned utility (as defined in section 1(h) of
this chapter).
(3) A not-for-profit utility (as defined in section 125(a) of this
chapter).
(4) A utility owned, operated, or held in trust by a
consolidated city.
(5) A cooperatively owned corporation.
(6) A regional district established under IC 13-26 that
provides water service, wastewater service, or both water
service and wastewater service.
2026 IN 1111—LS 6353/DI 119


(7) A conservancy district established under IC 14-33 that
provides water service, wastewater service, or both water
service and wastewater service.
(b) A utility may not charge a customer a reconnection fee to
restore terminated service to the customer.
(c) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-2-121, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2006,
SECTION 48, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 121. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, from December 1 through March 15 and from June 21 through
September 23 of any year, no an electric or gas utility, including a
municipally owned, privately owned, or cooperatively owned utility,
shall may not terminate residential electric or gas service for:
(1) persons who are eligible for and have applied for assistance
from a heating home energy assistance program administered
under IC 4-4-33; or
(2) residential customers whose residence includes a person
who is:
(A) sixty-five (65) years of age or older; or
(B) sixteen (16) years of age or younger.
The commission shall implement procedures to ensure that electric or
gas utility service is continued while eligibility for such persons and
customers is being determined.
(b) Any electric or gas utility, including a municipally owned,
privately owned, or cooperatively owned utility, shall provide any
residential customer whose account is delinquent an opportunity to
enter into a reasonable amortization agreement with such company to
pay the delinquent account. Such an amortization agreement must
provide the customer with adequate opportunity to apply for and
receive the benefits of any available public assistance program. An
amortization agreement is subject to amendment on the customer's
request if there is a change in the customer's financial circumstances.
(c) The commission may establish a reasonable rate of interest
which a utility may charge on the unpaid balance of a customer's
delinquent bill that may not exceed the rate established by the
commission under section 34.5 of this chapter.
(d) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry out
the provisions of this section.
(e) This section does not prohibit an electric or gas utility from
terminating residential utility service upon a request of a customer or
under the following circumstances:
2026 IN 1111—LS 6353/DI 119


(1) If a condition dangerous or hazardous to life, physical safety,
or property exists.
(2) Upon order by any court, the commission, or other duly
authorized public authority.
(3) If fraudulent or unauthorized use of electricity or gas is
detected and the utility has reasonable grounds to believe the
affected customer is responsible for such use.
(4) If the utility's regulating or measuring equipment has been
tampered with and the utility has reasonable grounds to believe
that the affected customer is responsible for such tampering.
SECTION 3. IC 8-1-2-123 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 123. An electric or gas utility, including a municipally
owned, privately owned, or cooperatively owned electric or gas
utility, shall:
(1) perform a monthly review of all new customer accounts to
identify residential customers who are sixty-two (62) years of
age or older; and
(2) not later than April 1 and October 1 of each year, send to
residential customers identified under subdivision (1), by
regular mail, information concerning relevant assistance
programs for the elderly, including:
(A) energy assistance programs;
(B) shut off protection programs; and
(C) in person assistance programs.
SECTION 4. IC 8-1-2-129 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 129. (a) If a residential customer's electric service is
interrupted during a billing cycle, a public utility shall provide the
residential customer a bill credit for the service interruption, as
calculated under subsection (b), on the residential customer's first
monthly bill after the interruption has concluded.
(b) A bill credit for a service interruption under subsection (a)
is equal to:
(1) the sum of:
(A) five dollars ($5) for the first full hour of the service
interruption;
(B) seven dollars ($7) for every full hour of the service
interruption more than one (1) hour but less than five (5)
hours after the start of the service interruption;
(C) ten dollars ($10) for every full hour of the service
interruption at least five (5) hours but less than twelve (12)
2026 IN 1111—LS 6353/DI 119


hours after the start of the service interruption;
(D) twelve dollars ($12) for every full hour of the service
interruption at least twelve (12) hours but less than
twenty-four (24) hours after the start of the service
interruption;
(E) fifteen dollars ($15) for every full hour of the service
interruption at least twenty-four (24) hours but less than
forty-eight (48) hours after the start of the service
interruption;
(F) eighteen dollars ($18) for every full hour of the service
interruption at least forty-eight (48) hours but less than
seventy-two (72) hours after the start of the service
interruption; and
(G) twenty-five dollars ($25) for every full hour of the
service interruption seventy-two (72) hours or more after
the start of the service interruption; plus
(2) either:
(A) one hundred dollars ($100) for the service interruption
if four (4) interruptions lasting a full hour or more have
occurred in the preceding twelve (12) month period; or
(B) two hundred dollars ($200) for the service interruption
if five (5) or more interruptions lasting a full hour or more
have occurred in the preceding twelve (12) month period.
(c) Any bill credits that are:
(1) applicable under this section; and
(2) in excess of the residential customer's first monthly bill
after the interruption has concluded;
shall be carried over to subsequent bills until the total credit has
been satisfied.
2026 IN 1111—LS 6353/DI 119